Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-555.01
Learning community;
districts; redistricting.

The election commissioners
of the applicable counties, pursuant to certification of the establishment
of a learning community pursuant to section 79-2102, shall divide the territory
of the new learning community into six numbered districts for the purpose
of electing members to the learning community coordinating council in compliance
with section 32-553 and for
the purpose of organizing achievement subcouncils pursuant to section 79-2117.
Such districts shall be compact and contiguous and substantially equal in
population. The newly established subcouncil districts shall
be certified to the Secretary of State on or before November 1 immediately
following such certification. The newly established subcouncil districts
shall apply beginning with the election of the first council members for such
learning community. Following the drawing of initial subcouncil districts
pursuant to this section, additional redistricting thereafter shall be undertaken
by the learning community coordinating council according to section 32-553.

Laws 2007, LB641, § 37;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 6.